Utah statutes.
31A-22-520.   Continuation of coverage during total disability.
(1)  An insured person in a group life insurance policy may continue coverage
during the total disability of the insured person or dependent by timely
payment to the policyholder of that portion, if any, of the premium that would
have been required on behalf of the insured person in the absence of total
disability.
(2)  The continuation shall be on a premium paying basis until the earlier of:
(a)  six months from the date of total disability;
(b)  approval by the insurer of continuation of the coverage under any
disability provision the group insurance policy may contain; or
(c)  the discontinuance of the group insurance policy.
(3)  If the group policy has a waiting period for an accident and health
benefit, the continuation extends to the end of the waiting period, even if
the group policy is otherwise discontinued.
